Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.042

Personal identifiers—Use of social security numbers prohibited.

(1) Institutions of higher education shall not use the social security number of any student, staff, or faculty for identification except for the purposes of employment, financial aid, research, assessment, accountability, transcripts, or as otherwise required by state or federal law.

(2) Each institution of higher education shall develop a system of personal identifiers for students to be used for grading and other administrative purposes. The personal identifiers may not be social security numbers.

[ 2001 c 103 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2001 c 103: "The legislature finds that the occurrences of identity theft are increasing. The legislature also finds that widespread use of the federally issued social security numbers has made identity theft more likely to occur." [ 2001 c 103 s 1.]

Effective date—2001 c 103 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 103 s 5.]